Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-201.01
Bonds or insurance; officers and employees; benefits; inure to state; exception.

No bond or equivalent commercial insurance determined by the Risk Manager to be furnished by officers and employees pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 11-201 shall be considered an official bond or insurance policy of such officers or employees, and no bond or policy so required by the Risk Manager shall inure to the benefit of other than the State of Nebraska, unless otherwise provided by the provisions of such bond or policy.

Laws 1967, c. 36, § 5, p. 162;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 11.